src/TestLexc-noun.txt
!!!
!
LEXICON Spatials_4cx
+Spat4+OrthPhon+Loc+Der/це:%>це kudo-N ;
+Spat4+Loc+Der/се:%>се kudo-N ;
+Spat4+Der/кс:%>кс osh-N ;

+Spat4+Lat+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;

+Spat4+Loc+Indef:%>О1 Nouns3-1 ; 
+Spat4+Prl+Indef:%>Г2а Nouns3-1 ;
+Spat4+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 Nouns3-1 ;

+Spat4+Abl:%>дО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Spat4+Loc:%>О1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ; 
+Spat4+Prl:%>Г2а Indef-DefSg-Poss ;


LEXICON Mezty
+Assoc+Pl+Nom:%>мезть Clitic ;
+Assoc+Dat:%>мезнень Clitic ;
+Assoc+Gen:%>мезень Clitic ;
+Assoc+Abl:%>мезде Clitic ;
+Assoc+Abe:%>мезевтеме Clitic ;
!+Assoc:%>мезть Clitic
!+Assoc:%>мезть Clitic

!!2011-03-21 THIS FAR


LEXICON Nouns-Secondary-declension
!!!!Secondary declension

+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Comp:%>О1шка Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Ela:%>стО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Ine:%>сО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Prl:%>Г2а Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Transl:%>О1кс Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;

LEXICON Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss

!!Possessive declension
+Poss1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss3Sg:%>О1нзО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Poss1Pl:%>О1нО1к Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss2Pl:%>О1нк Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss3Pl:%>О1ст Nouns1-1 ;



LEXICON Nouns1-1
+N1+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
+N1: Nouns_Voiceless ; 
+N1: Nouns1_A ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns1S-1 
+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1S+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
+N1S: Nouns1S_A_ReqVow ;
+N1S: Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns2I-1
+N2I+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:е Tenses-NomSg ;
+N2I+Abs+LVStem:е Tenses-Abs ;
+N2I+Abs+NoLVStem: Tenses-Abs-1 ;
+N2I+NoLVStem: Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;

LEXICON Nouns2I-y-1
+N2I+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:е Tenses-NomSg ;
+N2I+Abs+LVStem:е Tenses-Abs ;
+N2I+Abs+NoLVStem:ь Tenses-Abs-1 ;
+N2I+NoLVStem:ь Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;

LEXICON Nouns2I-j-1 
+N2I+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:е Tenses-NomSg ;
+N2I+Abs+LVStem:е Tenses-Abs ;
+N2I+Abs+NoLVStem:й Tenses-Abs-1 ;
+N2I+NoLVStem:й Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns2U-1
+N2U+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:о Tenses-NomSg ;
+N2U+Abs+LVStem:о Tenses-Abs ;
+N2U+Abs+NoLVStem: Tenses-Abs-1 ;
+N2U+NoLVStem: Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2U+LVStem:о Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N2U+LVStem:о Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns3-1
+N3+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
+N3+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
+N3: Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N3: Nouns2-a ;
 Mezty ;



LEXICON Indef-DefSg-Poss
+Indef: Tenses-Obl ;
+DefSg:%>О1нть Clitic ;
+Poss1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss3Sg:%>О1нзО1 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss1Pl:%>О1нО1к Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss2Pl:%>О1нк Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss3Pl:%>О1ст Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON Nouns_Voiceless
Nouns_Pl ;
Nouns_Shibilant ;


LEXICON Nouns_Shibilant
+Ill+Indef:%>с Clitic ;
+Ine:%>сО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Ela:%>стО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

LEXICON Nouns_Pl
+Indef+Pl:%>тЬ2 Tenses-NomPl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Abe:%>тне%>втеме Tenses-Obl  ;
+Pl.DefPl+Abl:%>тне%>де Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Com:%>тне%>нек Clitic ;
+Pl.DefPl+Comp:%>тне%>шка Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Dat:%>тне%>нень Clitic ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ela:%>тне%>стэ Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Gen:%>тне%>нь Clitic ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ill:%>тне%>с Clitic ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ine:%>тне%>сэ Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Lat:%>тне%>в Clitic ;
+Pl.DefPl+Nom:%>тне Tenses-NomPl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Prl:%>тне%>ва Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Transl:%>тне%>кс Tenses-Obl ;


LEXICON Nouns1_A
 Possessive-NomGen ;

+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Comp:%>О1шка Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Prl:%>Г2а Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Transl:%>О1кс Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

+Ill:%>О1з osh-Possessives2 ;

+Temporal:%>не Clitic ;
+Lat+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;

+Dat+Indef:%>нень Clitic ;
+Dat+Poss1Sg:%>нень Clitic ;
+Dat+Poss2Sg:%>тень Clitic ;
+Dat+Poss3:%>О1нстэнь Clitic ;



+NomDefSg:%>О1сь Tenses-NomSg ;
+GenDefSg:%>О1нть Clitic ;
+DatDefSg:%>О1нтень Clitic ;
+Gen+Indef:%>О1нь Tenses-Obl ;
+Com+Indef:%>нек Clitic ;

+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:%>теть Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:%>те Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss+3:%>О1нстО1 Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss2Pl:%>О1нстэнк Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Sg:%>О1нстэнзэ Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:%>О1нстэнст Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:%>О1нстэст Clitic ;
+Dial+Ill:%>з osh-Possessives2 ;

+Dial+NomSg+Poss3Sg:%>зО1 Tenses-NomSg ;

+Dial+NomSg+Poss1Pl:%>нО1к Tenses-NomSg ;
+Dial+NomPl+Poss1Pl:%>нО1к Tenses-NomPl ;
+Dial+Gen+Poss1Pl:%>нО1к Tenses-Obl ;

+Dial+NomDefSg:%>сь Tenses-NomSg ;
+Dial+GenDefSg:%>сть Clitic ;
+Dial+DatDefSg:%>стень Clitic ;


LEXICON Possessive-NomGen
+NomSg+Poss1Sg/м:%>О1м Tenses-NomSg ;
+Dial+NomPl+Poss1Sg/м:%>О1м Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss1Sg/м:%>О1м Tenses-Obl ;

+NomPl+Poss1Sg/Н:%>О1нЬ2 Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss1Sg/Н:%>О1нЬ2 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss1Sg+KinGen:%>О1нь Tenses-Obl ;

+NomSg+Poss2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss2Sg+KinGen:%>О1ть Tenses-Obl ;

+NomSg+Poss3Sg:%>О1зО1 Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss3Sg:%>О1нзО1 Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss3Sg:%>О1нзО1 Tenses-Obl ;

+NomSg+Poss1Pl:%>О1нО1к Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss1Pl:%>О1нО1к Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss1Pl:%>О1нО1к Tenses-Obl ;
+Dial+NomSg+Poss1Pl:%>О1мО1к Tenses-NomSg ;

+NomSg+Poss2Pl:%>О1нк Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss2Pl:%>О1нк Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss2Pl:%>О1нк Tenses-Obl ;

+NomSg+Poss3Pl:%>О1ст Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss3Pl:%>О1ст Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss3Pl:%>О1ст Tenses-Obl ;



!!!!!!!!Nouns1S_A
!HERE
LEXICON Nouns1S_A_ReqVow
 Possessive-NomGen ;

+LVStem+Ine:%>О1сО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+LVStem+Ela:%>О1стО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+LVStem+Comp:%>О1шка Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+LVStem+Ill:%>О1с Clitic ;

+Lat+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;


+NoLVStem+Ine:%>сО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+NoLVStem+Ela:%>стО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+NoLVStem+Comp:%>шка Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Transl:%>О1кс Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+NoLVStem+Ill:%>с Clitic ;

+LVStem+Dial+GenDefSg:%>О1сть Clitic ;
+LVStem+Dial+DatDefSg:%>О1стень Clitic ;
+Dat+Poss+3:%>О1нстэнь Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss+3:%>О1нстО1 Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Sg:%>О1нстэнзэ Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:%>О1нстэнст Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:%>О1нстэст Clitic ;


+NomDefSg:%>О1сь Tenses-NomSg ;
+GenDefSg:%>О1нть Clitic ;
+DatDefSg:%>О1нтень Clitic ;
+Gen+Indef:%>О1нь Tenses-Obl ;



LEXICON Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Prl:%>Г2а Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:%>теть Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:%>те Clitic ;
+Dat+Poss2Sg:%>тень Clitic ;
+Dat+Poss1Sg:%>нень Clitic ;


+Dat:%>нень Clitic ;
+Com:%>нек Clitic ;
+Temporal:%>не Clitic ;
!!This one would render voiceless "s"
+Dial+Ill:%>з osh-Possessives2 ;
+Dial+Sg+Nom+Poss3Sg:%>зО1 Tenses-NomSg ;
Nouns_Pl ;




!!!!!!!!Nouns2_A
LEXICON Nouns2-a
 Possessive-NomGen ;

+Dat+Poss1Sg:%>нень Clitic ;
+Dat+Poss2Sg:%>тень Clitic ;
+Dat:%>нень Clitic ;
+Com:%>нек Clitic ;
+Temporal:%>не Clitic ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Comp:%>О1шка Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Prl:%>Г2а Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Transl:%>О1кс Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

+Lat+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Ill:%>О1з osh-Possessives2 ;
+Dat+Poss+3:%>О1нстэнь Clitic ;

+NomDefSg:%>О1сь Tenses-NomSg ;
+GenDefSg:%>О1нть Clitic ;
+DatDefSg:%>О1нтень Clitic ;
+Gen+Indef:%>О1нь Tenses-Obl ;

+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:%>теть Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:%>те Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss+3:%>О1нстО1 Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Sg:%>О1нстэнзэ Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:%>О1нстэнст Clitic ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:%>О1нстэст Clitic ;


LEXICON istja-Gen-Attributes
 Clitic ; !This means that stem is word final !!!
+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 Clitic ;
+Indef+GenIndef:%>нь Tenses-Obl ;
+OrthOld+GenIndef+SOD:%>нсе Nouns3-1 ;
+OrthMorph+GenIndef+SOD:%>ньсе Nouns3-1 ;
+OrthPhon+GenIndef+SOD:%>нце Nouns3-1 ;


LEXICON chop-Gen-Attributes
 pek-Gen-Attributes ;

LEXICON PROP-M
кавалало+Adv+Spatial:кавалал Spatials_4cx ;
ки+Noun+Prl:киява Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
кудыкеле+Adv+Spatial:кудыкель Spatials_4cx ;
мастор+Adv+Spatial:мастор Spatials_4cx ;
салава+Pcle+Prl:салава istja-Gen-Attributes ;
састо+Adv:састо istja-Gen-Attributes ;
сеедьстэ+Adv+Temp:сеедьстэ istja-Gen-Attributes ;
сеедьстэ+Adv+Temp+OldOrth:сеетьстэ istja-Gen-Attributes ;
чинеле+Adv+Spatial:чинель Spatials_4cx ;
авасоло+Postp+Spatial:авасол Spatials_4cx ;
васоло+Postp+Spatial:васол Spatials_4cx ;
вере+Adv+Spatial:верь Spatials_4cx ;
икелепеле+Postp+Spatial:икелепель Spatials_4cx ;
латало+Postp+Spatial:латал Spatials_4cx ;
пандало+Postp+Spatial:пандал Spatials_4cx ;
перть-пеле+Orth_hyphen+Adv+Spatial:перть-пель Spatials_4cx ;
пильгало+Postp+Spatial:пильгал Spatials_4cx ;
пертьпеле+Adv+Spatial:пертьпель Spatials_4cx ;
